Maryland, session 2025, HB1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
11–203.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1212*

HOUSE BILL 1212
(a) (5) “Obscene” means:
(i) that the average adult applying contemporary community
standards would find that the work, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest;
(ii) that the work depicts sexual conduct specified in subsection (b)
of this section in a way that is patently offensive to prevailing standards in the adult
community as a whole with respect to what is suitable material; and
(iii) that the work, taken as a whole, lacks serious artistic,
educational, literary, political, or scientific value.
(b) (1) A person may not willfully or knowingly display or exhibit to a minor
an item:
(i) the cover or content of which is principally made up of an obscene
description or depiction of illicit sex; or
(ii) that consists of an obscene picture of a nude or partially nude
figure.
(2) A person may not willfully or knowingly engage in the business of
displaying, exhibiting, selling, showing, advertising for sale, or distributing to a minor an
item:
(i) the cover or content of which is principally made up of an obscene
description or depiction of illicit sex; or
(ii) that consists of an obscene picture of a nude or partially nude
figure.
(3) If a newsstand or other place of business is frequented by minors, the
owner, operator, franchisee, manager, or an employee with managerial responsibility may
not openly and knowingly display at the place of business an item whose sale, display,
exhibition, showing, or advertising is prohibited by paragraph (2) of this subsection.
11–203.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVATE” MEANS THE PROCESS OF POWERING ON A DEVICE
AND ASSOCIATING IT WITH A NEW USER ACCOUNT.
(3) “DEVICE” MEANS A TABLET OR A SMART PHONE MANUFACTURED
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 1212 3
(4) “FILTER” MEANS SOFTWARE INSTALLED ON A DEVICE THAT IS
CAPABLE OF PREVENTING THE DEVICE FROM ACCESSING OR DISPLAYING OBSCENE
MATERIAL THROUGH INTERNET BROWSERS OR SEARCH ENGINES.
(5) “INTERNET” MEANS THE GLOBAL INFORMATION SYSTEM THAT:
(I) IS LOGICALLY LINKED TOGETHER BY A GLOBALLY UNIQUE
ADDRESS SPACE BASED ON THE INTERNET PROTOCOL, OR ITS SUBSEQUENT
EXTENSIONS, THAT IS ABLE TO SUPPORT COMMUNICATIONS USING THE
TRANSMISSION CONTROL PROTOCOL OR INTERNET PROTOCOL SUITE, OR ITS
SUBSEQUENT EXTENSIONS, OR OTHER INTERNET PROTOCOL–COMPATIBLE
PROTOCOLS; AND
(II) PROVIDES, USES, OR MAKES ACCESSIBLE, EITHER
PUBLICLY OR PRIVATELY, HIGH–LEVEL SERVICES LAYERED ON COMMUNICATIONS
AND RELATED INFRASTRUCTURE.
(6) “MANUFACTURER” MEANS A PERSON OR COMPANY THAT:
(I) IS ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS OF MANUFACTURING A
DEVICE;
(II) HOLDS THE PATENTS FOR THE DEVICE IT MANUFACTURES;
AND
(III) HAS A COMMERCIALLY DESIGNATED REGISTERED AGENT IN
THE STATE.
(7) “MINOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS
WHO IS NOT:
(I) EMANCIPATED;
(II) MARRIED; OR
(III) A MEMBER OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES.
(8) “OBSCENE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1212
(9) “PASSWORD” MEANS A STRING OF CHARACTERS OR OTHER
SECURE METHOD USED TO ENABLE, DEACTIVATE, MODIFY, OR UNINSTALL A FILTER
ON A DEVICE.
(10) “SMART PHONE” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE THAT COMBINES
A CELL PHONE WITH A HAND–HELD COMPUTER, TYPICALLY OFFERING INTERNET
ACCESS THROUGH A BROWSER OR SEARCH ENGINE, DATA STORAGE, TEXT, AND
E–MAIL CAPABILITIES.
(11) “TABLET” MEANS AN INTERNET–READY DEVICE EQUIPPED WITH:
(I) AN OPERATING SYSTEM, TOUCHSCREEN DISPLAY, AND
RECHARGEABLE BATTERY; AND
(II) THE ABILITY TO SUPPORT ACCESS TO A CELLULAR
NETWORK.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, EACH DEVICE ACTIVATED IN THE STATE
SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE THE AGE OF THE USER DURING ACTIVATION AND
ACCOUNT SET–UP;
(2) ENABLE AN EXISTING FILTER FOR MINOR USERS, AT WHICH POINT
THE FILTER MUST BE SET TO THE ON POSITION WHEN THE USER IS A MINOR;
(3) PREVENT A MINOR FROM ACCESSING OBSCENE MATERIAL
THROUGH EACH INTERNET BROWSER OR SEARCH ENGINE ON THE DEVICE VIA:
(I) MOBILE DATA NETWORKS;
(II) WIRED INTERNET NETWORKS; AND
(III) WIRELESS INTERNET NETWORKS;
(4) NOTIFY THE MINOR USER OF THE DEVICE WHEN THE FILTER
BLOCKS THE DEVICE FROM ACCESSING A WEBSITE; AND
(5) ALLOW PARENTS OR LEGAL GUARDIANS OF MINOR USERS TO:
(I) DISABLE THE FILTER OR UNBLOCK A WEBSITE AFTER
PROVIDING REASONABLE AGE VERIFICATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1212 5
(II) CREATE A PASSWORD THAT MAY THEN BE USED TO
REACTIVATE THE FILTER AT ANY TIME.
(C) A PERSON, OTHER THAN A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN, MAY NOT
DEACTIVATE OR UNINSTALL THE FILTER REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION FOR A MINOR UNDER THE CARE AND CONTROL OF THE PARENT OR
GUARDIAN.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, A MANUFACTURER OF A DEVICE SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO CIVIL AND CRIMINAL LIABILITY IF:
(I) A DEVICE IS ACTIVATED IN THE STATE;
(II) THE DEVICE DOES NOT, ON ACTIVATION, ENABLE A FILTER
THAT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(III) A MINOR ACCESSES OBSCENE MATERIAL ON THE DEVICE.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THIS
SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MANUFACTURER THAT MAKES A GOOD FAITH
EFFORT TO PROVIDE A DEVICE THAT, ON ACTIVATION OF THE DEVICE IN THE STATE,
AUTOMATICALLY ENABLES A GENERALLY ACCEPTED AND COMMERCIALLY
REASONABLE FILTER THAT BLOCKS OBSCENE MATERIAL ON ALL INTERNET
BROWSERS OR SEARCH ENGINES ACCESSED ON THE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(3) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO CREATE A CAUSE OF
ACTION AGAINST THE RETAILER OF A DEVICE.
(E) (1) EXCEPT FOR A MINOR’S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN, A PERSON
IS CIVILLY LIABLE FOR DISABLING THE FILTER ON A DEVICE IN THE POSSESSION OF
THE MINOR IF THE MINOR ACCESSES OBSCENE MATERIAL.
(2) (I) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, EXCEPT FOR A PARENT OR
LEGAL GUARDIAN, A PERSON MAY NOT DISABLE THE FILTER ON A DEVICE IN THE
POSSESSION OF A MINOR.
(II) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS PARAGRAPH IS SUBJECT TO:
1. FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$5,000; AND

HOUSE BILL 1212
2. FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE,
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000.
(F) (1) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A
PERSON VIOLATED OR IS VIOLATING THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL,
ACTING IN PUBLIC INTEREST, MAY FILE A CIVIL CAUSE OF ACTION IN THE NAME OF
THE STATE AGAINST THE PERSON TO:
(I) ENJOIN AN ACTION THAT CONSTITUTES A VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION BY THE ISSUANCE OF A TEMPORARY RESTRAINING ORDER OR
PRELIMINARY OR PERMANENT INJUNCTION;
(II) RECOVER FROM THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 PER VIOLATION, AND NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 IN
AGGREGATE, AS DETERMINED BY THE COURT;
(III) RECOVER FROM THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL’S REASONABLE EXPENSES, INVESTIGATIVE COSTS, AND ATTORNEY’S
FEES; AND
(IV) OBTAIN OTHER APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ISSUE SUBPOENAS TO A PERSON
AND CONDUCT HEARINGS IN AID OF AN INVESTIGATION OR INQUIRY IN ADDITION TO
OTHER POWERS CONFERRED ON THE ATTORNEY GENERAL BY THIS SECTION.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK THE REVOCATION OF A
LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE AUTHORIZING A MANUFACTURER TO ENGAGE IN
BUSINESS IN THE STATE.
(4) FOR PURPOSES OF ASSESSING A PENALTY UNDER THIS SECTION,
A MANUFACTURER IS CONSIDERED TO HAVE COMMITTED A SEPARATE VIOLATION
FOR EACH DEVICE MANUFACTURED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, THAT VIOLATES
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(G) (1) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR WHO ACCESSES
OBSCENE MATERIAL IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY FILE A PRIVATE CAUSE OF
ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION AGAINST A MANUFACTURER WHO
FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF MAY RECOVER:

HOUSE BILL 1212 7
(I) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(II) IN THE DISCRETION OF THE COURT WHERE ACTUAL
DAMAGES ARE DIFFICULT TO ASCERTAIN DUE TO THE NATURE OF THE INJURY,
LIQUIDATED DAMAGES IN THE AMOUNT OF $50,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION;
(III) WHEN THE VIOLATION IS FOUND TO BE KNOWING AND
WILLFUL, PUNITIVE DAMAGES IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COURT;
(IV) NOMINAL DAMAGES;
(V) OTHER RELIEF AS THE COURT CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE,
INCLUDING REASONABLE COURT COSTS AND EXPENSES; AND
(VI) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(3) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PRECLUDE THE
BRINGING OF A CLASS ACTION LAWSUIT AGAINST A MANUFACTURER WHEN ITS
CONDUCT IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS KNOWING AND WILLFUL.
(4) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR WHO ACCESSES
OBSCENE MATERIAL IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY FILE A PRIVATE CAUSE OF
ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION AGAINST A PERSON WHO
DISABLES THE FILTER FROM A DEVICE THAT RESULTS IN THE CHILD BEING
EXPOSED TO OBSCENE CONTENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.